Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1214.01
Licensed water well monitoring technician, defined.

Licensed water well monitoring technician means any individual who has obtained a license from the department and who is engaged solely in the measuring of ground water levels, the collection of ground water samples from existing water wells, or the inspection of installed water well equipment or pumping systems. A licensed water well monitoring technician shall not supervise the work of others.

Laws 1991, LB 51, § 20;

Laws 2001, LB 133, § 6;

Laws 2001, LB 667, § 17;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1154.